src/scripts/Macedonian/numbers.foma
# SPDX-License-Identifier: GPL-3.0-or-later

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# Copyright (C) 2021 Non-Routine LLC.  <lp@louderpages.org>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, version 3.0 of the License.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Affero General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define nogenderUnit 
%0: нула |
3:три | 
4:четири | 
5:пет | 
6:шест | 
7:седум | 
8:осум | 
9:девет ; 

define MascUnit 
1:еден | #, една,едно
2:два  | #, две, две
nogenderUnit;

define FemUnit 
1:една |
2:две | 
nogenderUnit;

define MaleOrdUnit 
1:први | 
2:втори | 
3:трети | 
4:четврти | 
5:петти  | 
6:шести  | 
7:седми  | 
8:осми  | 
9:деветти ; 

define MaleDefOrdUnit 
1:првиот | 
2:вториот | 
3:третиот | 
4:четвртиот | 
5:петтиот  | 
6:шестиот  | 
7:седмиот  | 
8:осмиот  | 
9:деветтиот ; 

define FemaleOrdUnit 
1:прва | 
2:втора | 
3:трета | 
4:четврта | 
5:петта  | 
6:шеста | 
7:седма | 
8:осма  | 
9:деветта ; 

define FemaleDefOrdUnit 
1:првата | 
2:втората | 
3:третата | 
4:четвртата | 
5:петтата  | 
6:шестата | 
7:седмата | 
8:осмата  | 
9:деветтата ; 

define NeuterOrdUnit 
1:прво | 
2:второ | 
3:трето | 
4:четврто | 
5:петто | 
6:шесто  | 
7:седмо  | 
8:осмо | 
9:деветто ; 

define NeuterDefOrdUnit 
1:првото | 
2:второто | 
3:третото | 
4:четвртото | 
5:петтото | 
6:шестото  | 
7:седмото  | 
8:осмото | 
9:деветтото ; 

define Teen 
1:единаесет| #, една,едно
2:дванаесет | #, две, две
3:тринаесет| 
4:четиринаесет| 
5:петнаесет| 
6:шеснаесет| 
7:седумнаесет| 
8:осумнаесет| 
9:деветнаесет; 

define MaleOrdTeen 
1:единаесетти |  
2:дванаесетти | 
3:тринаесетти |  
4:четиринаесетти |  
5:петнаесетти |  
6:шеснаесетти |  
7:седумнаесетти |  
8:осумнаесетти |  
9:деветнаесетти ; 

define MaleDefOrdTeen 
1:единаесеттиот |  
2:дванаесеттиот | 
3:тринаесеттиот |  
4:четиринаесеттиот |  
5:петнаесеттиот |  
6:шеснаесеттиот |  
7:седумнаесеттиот |  
8:осумнаесеттиот |  
9:деветнаесеттиот ; 

define FemaleOrdTeen 
1:единаесетта |  
2:дванаесетта | 
3:тринаесетта |  
4:четиринаесетта |  
5:петнаесетта |  
6:шеснаесетта |  
7:седумнаесетта |  
8:осумнаесетта |  
9:деветнаесетта ; 

define FemaleDefrdTeen 
1:единаесеттата |  
2:дванаесеттата | 
3:тринаесеттата |  
4:четиринаесеттата |  
5:петнаесеттата |  
6:шеснаесеттата |  
7:седумнаесеттата |  
8:осумнаесеттата |  
9:деветнаесеттата ; 

define NeuterOrdTeen 
1:единаесетто |  
2:дванаесетто | 
3:тринаесетто |  
4:четиринаесетто |  
5:петнаесетто |  
6:шеснаесетто |  
7:седумнаесетто |  
8:осумнаесетто |  
9:деветнаесетто ; 

define NeuterOrdTeen 
1:единаесеттото |  
2:дванаесеттото | 
3:тринаесеттото |  
4:четиринаесеттото |  
5:петнаесеттото |  
6:шеснаесеттото |  
7:седумнаесеттото |  
8:осумнаесеттото |  
9:деветнаесеттото ; 

define Ten 
1:десет |
2:дваесет | 
3:триесет | 
4:четириесет | 
5:педесет | 
6:шеесет | 
7:седумдесет | 
8:осумдесет | 
9:деведесет;

define MaleOrdTen 
1:десетти |
2:дваесетти | 
3:триесетти | 
4:четириесетти | 
5:педесетти | 
6:шеесетти | 
7:седумдесетти | 
8:осумдесетти | 
9:деведесетти ;

define MaleDefOrdTen 
1:десеттиот |
2:дваесеттиот | 
3:триесеттиот | 
4:четириесеттиот | 
5:педесеттиот | 
6:шеесеттиот | 
7:седумдесеттиот | 
8:осумдесеттиот | 
9:деведесеттиот ;

define FemaleOrdTen 
1:десетта |
2:дваесетта | 
3:триесетта | 
4:четириесетта | 
5:педесетта | 
6:шеесетта | 
7:седумдесетта | 
8:осумдесетта | 
9:деведесетта ;

define FemaleDefOrdTen 
1:десеттата |
2:дваесеттата | 
3:триесеттата | 
4:четириесеттата | 
5:педесеттата | 
6:шеесеттата | 
7:седумдесеттата | 
8:осумдесеттата | 
9:деведесеттата ;

define NeuterOrdTen 
1:десетто |
2:дваесетто | 
3:триесетто | 
4:четириесетто | 
5:педесетто | 
6:шеесетто | 
7:седумдесетто | 
8:осумдесетто | 
9:деведесетто ;

define NeuterDefOrdTen 
1:десеттото |
2:дваесеттото | 
3:триесеттото | 
4:четириесеттото | 
5:педесеттото | 
6:шеесеттото | 
7:седумдесеттото | 
8:осумдесеттото | 
9:деведесеттото ;

define Hundred 
1:сто | 
2:двесте | 
3:триста | 
4:четиристотини | 
5:петстотини | 
6:шестотини | 
7:седумстотини | 
8:осумстотини | 
9:деветстотими ; 

define MaleOrdHundred 
1:стоти | 
2:двестети | 
3:тристати | 
4:четиристоти | 
5:петстоти | 
6:шестоти | 
7:седумстоти | 
8:осумстоти | 
9:деветстоти ; 

define MaleDefOrdHundred 
1:стотиот | 
2:двестетиот | 
3:тристатиот | 
4:четиристотиот | 
5:петстотиот | 
6:шестотиот | 
7:седумстотиот | 
8:осумстотиот | 
9:деветстотиот ; 

define FemaleOrdHundred 
1:стота | 
2:двестета | 
3:тристата | 
4:четиристота | 
5:петстота | 
6:шестота | 
7:седумстота | 
8:осумстота | 
9:деветстота ; 

define FemaleDefOrdHundred 
1:стотата | 
2:двестетата | 
3:тристатата | 
4:четиристотата | 
5:петстотата | 
6:шестотата | 
7:седумстотата | 
8:осумстотата | 
9:деветстотата ; 

define NeuterOrdHundred 
1:стото | 
2:двестето | 
3:тристато | 
4:четиристото | 
5:петстото | 
6:шестото | 
7:седумстото | 
8:осумстото | 
9:деветстото ; 

define NeuterDefOrdHundred 
1:стотото | 
2:двестетото | 
3:тристатото | 
4:четиристотото | 
5:петстотото | 
6:шестотото | 
7:седумстотото | 
8:осумстотото | 
9:деветстотото ; 

define TenOrHundredSymbol ten|hnd ; 

# ----------------------------
define NZDigit 1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9 ; 
define Digit %0|NZDigit ; 

source OrdinalSuffixes.foma

define UnformattedNumber %0 | [NZDigit Digit^<15] ; 
define FormattedNumber NZDigit Digit^<3 [%. Digit^3]^{1,4} ; 
define RegularDecimal [FormattedNumber|UnformattedNumber] %, Digit+;   #  3.000.320(,022)
define ForeignDecimal UnformattedNumber %. [Digit^<3 | Digit^>3];   # foreign DP 1.02
define Ordinal	[FormattedNumber|UnformattedNumber]  OrdSuffix ;   #  number (has to be without commas) followed by ordinal marker
define ArabicNumber UnformattedNumber | FormattedNumber | RegularDecimal | ForeignDecimal | Ordinal;

# tag valid numbers
define tagNumberTypes 
  [FormattedNumber|UnformattedNumber] @-> ... wnum || .#. _ (%, Digit+)  .#. ,,  #  3.000.320(,022)
	UnformattedNumber @-> ... wnum || .#. _ (%. Digit+)  .#.  ,,   # foreign DP 1.02
	# UnformattedNumber @-> ... wnum || .#. _ (%. [Digit^{1,2} | Digit^>3])  .#.  ,,   # foreign DP 1.02
	[FormattedNumber|UnformattedNumber] @-> ... wnum ord || .#. _ [%. | OrdSuffix] .#. ;   #  number (has to be without commas) followed by ordinal marker

# We expect this code to be protected from strings contain other than digits, commas and periods.
# We will, however, catch non-numbers which has slipped through, like  20.0.1  or 20,11,111
define tagCascade 
   [  [%,|%.] -> ... dp || wnum  _ Digit+ .#. ]    # place decimal point after whole numbers
  .o. [ [%.]:0  -> || _ ?* wnum ]  #  get rid of the thousands dividers
	.o. [ Digit -> ... dec  || dp Digit* _ .#. ]  # mark decimal
	.o. [ dec -> wnum || dp NZDigit Digit^<3 _ .#. ]  # See (1) below, "Un-Decimalize"  
 	.o. [ Digit-> ... wnum || [.#. | \Digit] Digit* _ [ .#. | %. | %, ]];    #  not a whole number, or decimal

# (1) Un-Decimalize For decimal parts, we want any sequence without a leading zero, up to three places, to be read as a whole
# number rather than a list of digits

# by now we have wnum tags for numbers which should be read as whole numbers, dec for those which should be treated differently,# ord tag after wnum, and periods and commas dotted about. 

define tagRules  tagNumberTypes .o. tagCascade; 

# For whole numbers change the markers for singles
define preTranslate [1 thns] -> [1 thn] || _ ,,
  [1 mlns] -> [1 mln] || _ ,,
  [1 blns] -> [1 bln] || _ ,,
  [1 tlns] -> [1 tln] || _ ;
#----------------------------

define PowerOfThousandSymbol thns|mlns|blns|tlns|thn|mln|bln|tln ; 
define PowerOfTenSymbol TenOrHundredSymbol|PowerOfThousandSymbol ; 

# define SeparatePowerOfThousand(s) [..] -> s || Digit _ Digit^3 wnum  ; 
 define SeparatePowerOfThousand(s) [..] -> s || Digit _ Digit^3 [\dec & \Digit]  ; 

define PowerOfThousandSymbolsToSingular 
[mlns:mln|blns:bln|tlns:tln] -> || [[PowerOfThousandSymbol (and)]|wnum] 1 _ ; 

define RemoveSilentGroups 
%0^3 (PowerOfThousandSymbol) @-> 0 || _ ?* wnum ; 

define SeparateHundreds 
[..] -> hnd ||  Digit _ Digit^2 ?* wnum; 

define Mark100s 
hnd -> hnd0 || 1 _ {00} ; 

define SeparateTens 
[..] -> ten ||  Digit _ Digit ?* wnum; 

define RemoveZeros 
%0  (TenOrHundredSymbol) @-> 0 || _ ?* wnum; 

define MarkTeens 
[[1 ten]:0] NZDigit [0:[teen %0]] -> ; 

define InsertAnds [..] -> and || 
 [.#.|dp] \dp+ _ NZDigit [ [PowerOfThosandSymbol|hnd|teen|ten] %0]* [PowerOfThousandSymbol|wnum]  ; # puts a single 'and', before the last non-zero element

define RemoveOnes 
1 -> 0 || .#. _ thn ; 

define  processOrdinals 
# first the indefs, then the defs. Because we need to output whole words as symbols, we cannot build up these forms using syntactical rules. Ironic.
 MaleOrdUnit ->  ||  _ wnum ord MaleOrdSuffix .#. ,, 
 FemaleOrdUnit ->  ||  _ wnum ord FemaleOrdSuffix .#. ,, 
 NeuterOrdUnit ->  ||  _ wnum ord NeuterOrdSuffix .#. ,, 
 [MaleOrdTeen teen:0]->  ||  _ wnum ord MaleOrdSuffix .#. ,, 
 [FemaleOrdTeen teen:0] ->  ||  _ wnum ord FemaleOrdSuffix .#. ,, 
 [NeuterOrdTeen teen:0] ->  ||  _ wnum ord NeuterOrdSuffix .#. ,, 
 [MaleOrdTen ten:0] ->  ||  _ wnum ord MaleOrdSuffix .#. ,, 
 [FemaleOrdTen ten:0] ->  ||  _ wnum ord FemaleOrdSuffix .#. ,, 
 [NeuterOrdTen ten:0] ->  ||  _ wnum ord NeuterOrdSuffix .#. ,,
 [MaleOrdHundred [hnd|hnds]:0] ->  ||  _  wnum ord MaleOrdSuffix .#. ,, 
 [FemaleOrdHundred [hnd|hnds]:0] ->  ||  _  wnum ord FemaleOrdSuffix .#. ,, 
 [NeuterOrdHundred [hnd|hnds]:0] ->  ||  _  wnum ord NeuterOrdSuffix .#. ,,

 MaleDefOrdUnit ->  ||  _ wnum ord MaleDefOrdSuffix .#. ,, 
 FemaleDefOrdUnit ->  ||  _ wnum ord FemaleDefOrdSuffix .#. ,, 
 NeuterDefOrdUnit ->  ||  _ wnum ord NeuterDefOrdSuffix .#. ,, 
 [MaleDefOrdTeen teen:0]->  ||  _ wnum ord MaleDefOrdSuffix .#. ,, 
 [FemaleDefOrdTeen teen:0] ->  ||  _ wnum ord FemaleDefOrdSuffix .#. ,, 
 [NeuterDefOrdTeen teen:0] ->  ||  _ wnum ord NeuterDefOrdSuffix .#. ,, 
 [MaleDefOrdTen ten:0] ->  ||  _ wnum ord MaleDefOrdSuffix .#. ,, 
 [FemaleDefOrdTen ten:0] ->  ||  _ wnum ord FemaleDefOrdSuffix .#. ,, 
 [NeuterDefOrdTen ten:0] ->  ||  _ wnum ord NeuterDefOrdSuffix .#. ,,
 [MaleDefOrdHundred [hnd|hnds]:0] ->  ||  _  wnum ord MaleDefOrdSuffix .#. ,, 
 [FemaleDefOrdHundred [hnd|hnds]:0] ->  ||  _  wnum ord FemaleDefOrdSuffix .#. ,, 
 [NeuterDefOrdHundred [hnd|hnds]:0] ->  ||  _  wnum ord NeuterDefOrdSuffix  .#.;
